Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 3. Television and Certain Video Advertisement Requirements.

§ 24.2-957.
General provisions; applicability to advertisements in video format.

Television outlets and online platforms shall not be liable under this article for carriage of political advertisements that fail to include the disclosure requirements provided for in this article. This provision supersedes any contrary provisions of the Code of Virginia.

If the sponsor does not have the option of controlling the audio, if any, heard during the television advertisement, the disclosure requirements shall be the same as for print media.

The person accepting an advertisement for a television outlet shall require, and for one year shall retain a copy of, proof of identity of the person who submits the advertisement for broadcast. Proof of identity shall be submitted either (i) in person and include a valid Virginia driver’s license, or any other identification card issued by a government agency of the Commonwealth, one of its political subdivisions, or the United States, or (ii) other than in person, in which case, the person submitting the advertisement shall provide a telephone number and the person accepting the advertisement may phone the person to verify the validity of the person’s identifying information before broadcasting the advertisement.

Any disclosure statement required by this article shall be displayed in a conspicuous manner.

An advertisement that is in video format and is placed or promoted for a fee on an online platform shall be subject to the same disclosure requirements to which television advertisements are subject pursuant to this article.

History.

2002, c. 487, § 24.2-944; 2004, cc. 55, 457; 2005, c. 369; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2020, c. 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 551, inserted “and Certain Video” in the Article 3 heading in Chapter 9.5.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 551, in subsection A, inserted “and online platforms” in the first sentence and added subsection E.

§ 24.2-957.1.
Requirements for television advertisements sponsored by a candidate or candidate campaign committee.

It shall be unlawful for any candidate or a candidate campaign committee to sponsor a television advertisement that constitutes an expenditure or contribution required to be disclosed under Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) unless the following requirements are met:

It bears the legend or includes the statement: “Paid for by [Name of candidate or campaign committee as it appears on the statement of organization].” Alternatively, if the advertisement is supporting that candidate and the advertisement makes no reference to any other clearly identified candidate, then the statement “Paid for by [Name of sponsor]” may be replaced by the statement “Authorized by [Name of sponsor].”

Click to viewThe disclosure shall be made by visual legend, which shall constitute 20 scan lines in size. The content of these visual legends is specified by the Communications Act of 1934, 47 U.S.C. §§ 315 and 317 and this section.

If the advertisement sponsored by the candidate or the candidate campaign committee makes reference to another clearly identified candidate, it must include a disclosure statement spoken by the sponsoring candidate containing at least the following words: “I am (or ‘This is ’) [Name of candidate], candidate for [Name of] office, and I (or ‘my campaign’) sponsored this ad.”

Click to viewThe candidate or the candidate campaign committee may provide the oral disclosure statement required by this section at the same time as the visual disclosure required under the Communications Act of 1934, 47 U.S.C. §§ 315 and 317, is shown.

The advertisement shall include throughout the disclosure statement an unobscured, full-screen picture containing the candidate, either in photographic form or through the actual appearance of the candidate on camera.

The candidate or the campaign committee may place the disclosure statement required by this section at any point during the advertisement, except if the duration of the advertisement is more than five minutes, the disclosure statement shall be made both at the beginning and end of the advertisement.

In its oral disclosure statement, the sponsor may choose to identify an advertisement as either supporting or opposing the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates.

If an advertisement is jointly sponsored, the disclosure statement shall include the names of all the sponsors and the candidate shall be the disclosing individual. If more than one candidate is the sponsor, at least one of the candidates shall be the disclosing individual.

History.

2002, c. 487, § 24.2-944; 2004, cc. 55, 457; 2005, c. 369; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2020, c. 615.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 615, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 615, cl. 3 provides: “That print media advertisements paid for or distributed prior to the effective date of this act shall not be subject to the provisions of this act.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 615, effective January 1, 2021, in subdivision 1, inserted “as it appears on the statement of organization” in the first paragraph.

§ 24.2-957.2.
Requirements for television advertisements sponsored by a political committee.

It shall be unlawful for a political committee to sponsor a television advertisement that constitutes an expenditure or contribution required to be disclosed under Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) unless the following requirements are met:

It bears the legend or includes the statement: “Paid for by [Name of political committee].”

Click to view

A television advertisement supporting or opposing the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates (i) shall include a disclosure statement, spoken by the chief executive officer or treasurer of the political committee, containing at least the following words: “The [Name of political committee] sponsored this ad.”

If an advertisement is jointly sponsored, the disclosure statement shall include the names of all the sponsors and the disclosing individual shall be one of those sponsors.

The disclosure shall be made by visual legend, which shall constitute 20 scan lines in size.

The content of these visual legends is specified by the Communications Act of 1934, 47 U.S.C. §§ 315 and 317 and this section.

The political committee may provide the oral disclosure statement required by this section at the same time as the visual disclosure required under the Communications Act of 1934, 47 U.S.C. §§ 315 and 317, is shown.

The advertisement shall include throughout the disclosure statement an unobscured, full-screen picture containing the disclosing individual, either in photographic form or through the actual appearance of the disclosing individual on camera.

A political committee may place the disclosure statement required by this section at any point during the advertisement, except if the duration of the advertisement is more than five minutes, the disclosure statement shall be made both at the beginning and end of the advertisement.

In its oral disclosure statement, a political committee may choose to identify an advertisement as either supporting or opposing the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates.

If the advertisement is jointly sponsored, the disclosure statement shall name all of the sponsors and the disclosing individual shall be one of those sponsors. This provision supersedes any contrary provisions of the Code of Virginia.

History.

2002, c. 487, §§ 24.2-943, 24.2-944; 2003, c. 237; 2004, cc. 55, 457; 2005, c. 369; 2006, cc. 787, 892.

§ 24.2-957.3.
Requirements for television advertisements sponsored by a person that is not a candidate campaign committee or political committee.

It shall be unlawful for a person to sponsor a television advertisement that constitutes an expenditure or contribution required to be disclosed under Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) unless the following requirements are met:

If the sponsor is an individual, a disclosure statement spoken by the individual containing at least the following words: “I am [individual’s name], and I sponsored this ad.”

If the sponsor is a corporation, partnership, business, labor organization, membership organization, association, cooperative, or other like entity, a disclosure statement spoken by the chief executive officer containing at least the following words: “[Name of sponsor] paid for (or ‘sponsored’ or ‘furnished’) this ad.”

In its oral disclosure statement, a person may choose to identify an advertisement as either supporting or opposing the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates.

If an advertisement is jointly sponsored, the disclosure statement shall include the names of all the sponsors.

History.

2002, c. 487, § 24.2-944; 2004, cc. 55, 457; 2005, c. 369; 2006, cc. 787, 892.